Hawaii statutes.
§651-7 Writ; how issued. The writ of
attachment shall be issued by the clerk with the approval of the court and
directed to any police officer, and shall require the police officer to attach
and safely keep so much of the property of the defendant as will be sufficient
to satisfy the demand of the plaintiff, with costs and expenses. [L 1905, c 84,
§7; RL 1925, §2811; RL 1935, §4196; RL 1945, §10147; RL 1955, §233-7; HRS
§651-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next